Hawaii, session 2025, SB823.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the State continues to face various challenges when addressing the needs of children with special needs under the age of three. One of these challenges includes significant vacancy rates for the State's early intervention providers, as Hawaii has a thirty to forty-two per cent vacancy rate across all early intervention programs.  The impacts of these challenges include infant and toddler development and the State's ability to be in compliance with certain federal mandates. The legislature further finds that addressing recruitment and retention of certain early intervention specialists will allow the State to fill vacant positions and ensure that infants and toddlers with special needs receive the services they are entitled to.  Additionally, establishing mental health specialist positions will help increase the State's resources to meet infant and early childhood mental health needs. The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Require the department of human resources development to reclassify certain positions within the early childhood services unit of the department of health early intervention section; and (2)  Appropriate funds for the reclassification of certain positions and establishment of mental health specialist positions within the early childhood services unit of the department of health early intervention section. SECTION 2.  The department of human resources development shall reclassify the following positions within the early childhood services unit of the department of health early intervention section as follows: (1)  Physical therapist III to physical therapist IV; (2)  Special education teacher III to special education teacher IV; and (3)  Occupational therapist III to occupational therapist IV. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $48,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the reclassification of certain positions within the early childhood services unit of the department of health early intervention section pursuant to section 2 of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $142,032 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of two full-time equivalent (2.00 FTE) permanent mental health specialist positions within the early childhood services unit of the department of health early intervention section; provided that the salary schedule for each position shall be set at a mental health specialist salary schedule. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________